District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-930

Board of directors; composition; appointment; term of office; vacancies; quorum.

Repealed.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-170, § 5, 33 DCR 7188
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(j), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 31-2504.